Hawaii statutes.
[PART IV.
JOB APPLICATION PROCESSING FEES]

[§388-51] Job application processing fee.
Except as provided for by chapter 373 and rules adopted thereto, no employer
shall require to be paid or to be borne by an employee or prospective employee
a job application processing fee. [L 1987, c 169, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next